Utah statutes.
58-42a-301.   Licensure required -- License classification.

(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of occupational therapy, except as specifically provided in Section 58-1-307 or 58-42a-304.

(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a license in the classification of:

(a)  occupational therapist; or

(b)  occupational therapy assistant.

(3)  Nothing in this chapter shall permit an individual licensed under this chapter to engage in the practice of mental health therapy.



Enacted by Chapter 240, 1994 General Session

